Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,108.04
Sealing of records; notification of proceedings; order of court; hearing; notice; findings; considerations.

(1) When a proceeding to seal the record is initiated, the court shall promptly notify the county attorney or city attorney involved in the case that is the subject of the proceeding to seal the record of the proceedings, and shall promptly notify the Department of Health and Human Services of the proceedings if the juvenile whose record is the subject of the proceeding is a ward of the state at the time the proceeding is initiated or if the department was a party in the proceeding.

(2) A party notified under subsection (1) of this section may file a response with the court within thirty days after receiving such notice. Any such response shall be served on all parties to the case. If the response objects to the sealing of a record, such response shall specify which factor or factors under subsection (5) of this section form the basis for the objection and shall set forth the facts supporting any argument that the juvenile has not been satisfactorily rehabilitated.

(3) If a party notified under subsection (1) of this section does not file a response with the court or files a response that indicates there is no objection to the sealing of the record, the court shall order that the record of the juvenile under consideration be sealed.

(4) If a party receiving notice under subsection (1) of this section files a response with the court objecting to the sealing of the record, the court shall conduct a hearing on the motion within sixty days after the court receives the response. The court shall give notice, by regular mail, of the date, time, and location of the hearing to the parties receiving notice under subsection (1) of this section and to the juvenile who is the subject of the record under consideration.

(5) After conducting a hearing in accordance with this section, the court shall order the record of the juvenile that is the subject of the motion be sealed if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile has been rehabilitated to a satisfactory degree. In determining whether the juvenile has been rehabilitated to a satisfactory degree, the court may consider all of the following:

(a) The behavior of the juvenile after the disposition, adjudication, diversion, or sentence and the juvenile's response to diversion, mediation, restorative justice, probation, supervision, other treatment or rehabilitation program, or sentence;

(b) The education and employment history of the juvenile; and

(c) Any other circumstances that may relate to the rehabilitation of the juvenile.

(6) If, after conducting the hearing in accordance with this section, the juvenile is not found to be satisfactorily rehabilitated such that the record is not ordered to be sealed, a juvenile who is a person described in section 43-2,108.01 or such juvenile's parent or guardian may not move the court to seal the record for one year after the court's decision not to seal the record is made, unless such time restriction is waived by the court.

Laws 2010, LB800, § 29;

Laws 2011, LB463, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB354, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 35.